bg-BG: Регулиране на теглото: Регулируема; Фиксирана; Зареждаема; Друго
cs: Nastavitelnost hmotnosti: Nastavitelná; Pevná; Nakládací; Jiná
fi: Painon säädettävyys: Säädettävä; Kiinteä; Ladattava; Muu
sv: Justerbarhet för vikt: Justerbar; Fast; Pålastningsbar; Övrigt
vi: Khả năng điều chỉnh trọng lượng: Có thể điều chỉnh; Cố định; Có thể thêm tạ; Khác
tr: Ağırlık ayarlanabilirliği: Ayarlanabilir; Sabit; Yüklenebilir; Diğer
ru: Регулируемость веса: Регулируемый; Фиксированный; Нагружаемый; Другое
ja: ウエイト調節機能: 調整可能; 固定; 充填可能; その他
pt-PT: Capacidade de ajuste do peso: Ajustável; Fixo; Carregável; Outro
en: Weight adjustability: Adjustable; Fixed; Loadable; Other
zh-CN: 重量可调性: 可调节; 固定; 可加重; 其他
it: Regolabilità del peso: Regolabile; Fissa; Caricabile; Altro
el: Ρυθμιζόμενη δυνατότητα βάρους: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Σταθερό; Γεμιζόμενο; Άλλο
th: สามารถปรับน้ำหนักได้: ปรับได้; คงที่; เพิ่มน้ำหนักได้; อื่นๆ
hu: Súly állíthatósága: Állítható; Fix; Bővíthető; Egyéb
es: Capacidad de ajuste de peso: Ajustable; Fijo; Cargable; Otro
nl: Aanpasbaarheid weerstand: Verstelbaar; Vast; Belaadbaar; Overig
pl: Możliwość regulacji masy: Regulowana; Stała; Z możliwością dociążenia; Inne
sl-SI: Nastavljivost teže: Nastavljivo; Fiksno; Možnost dodajanja teže; Drugo
ro-RO: Ajustabilitatea greutății: Ajustabil; Fix; Încărcabil; Altele
de: Regulierbarkeit des Gewichts: Verstellbar; Fest; Beladbar; Andere
nb: Justerbarhet for vekt: Justerbar; Fast; Lastbar; Annet
hr-HR: Podesivost težine: Prilagodljivo; Fiksno; Opteretivo; Ostalo
da: Vægtjusterbarhed: Justerbar; Fast; Med vægtskiver; Andet
pt-BR: Ajuste de peso: Ajustável; Fixo; Carregável; Outro
zh-TW: 重量可調整性: 可調整; 固定; 可加重; 其他
sk-SK: Nastaviteľnosť hmotnosti: Nastaviteľné; Pevné; Nakladacie; Iné
lt-LT: Galimybė reguliuoti svorį: Reguliuojamas; Fiksuotas; Pildomas; Kita
fr: Réglage du poids: Ajustable; Fixe; Pondérable; Autre
ko: 무게 조절 기능: 조절 가능; 고정형; 무게 추가 가능; 기타